Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Private Foundations — Charitable Trusts

386.350.
Definitions for KRS 386.355 and 386.360.

As used in KRS

386.355

and

386.360

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, in effect on January 1, 1970, including all appropriate provisions of the Tax Reform Act of 1969 at the dates specified in that law, exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to December 31, 1969.

“Trust” includes a trust or any other entity (other than a corporation) which has, in whole or in part, a charitable purpose.

“Trustee” includes any member of the governing body of any trust, as defined in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 344, § 1; 1974, ch. 56, § 1.

386.355.
Acts prohibited — Policy of state regarding private foundations — Split-interest trusts — Charitable trusts.

In the administration of any trust which is a “private foundation” as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code, a trust for charitable purposes described in Section 4947(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent that it is treated for federal tax purposes as such a private foundation, or a “split-interest trust” as described in Section 4947(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, the following acts are prohibited:

Engaging in any act of “self-dealing” (as defined in Section 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code) which would give rise to any liability for any tax imposed by Section 4941 of the Internal Revenue Code;

Retaining any “excess business holdings” (as defined in Section 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code) which would give rise to any liability for any tax imposed by Section 4943 of the Internal Revenue Code;

Making any investments which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the trust, within the meaning of Section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code, so as to give rise to any liability for any tax imposed by Section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code; and

Making any “taxable expenditures” (as defined in Section 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code) which would give rise to any liability for any tax imposed by Section 4945 of the Internal Revenue Code; provided, however, that the prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to split-interest trusts or to amounts thereof, to the extent that such prohibitions are made inapplicable thereto by Section 4947 of the Internal Revenue Code.

In the administration of any trust which is a “private foundation” as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code, or a trust for charitable purposes described in Section 4947(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent that it is treated for federal tax purposes as such a private foundation, there shall, for the purposes specified in the governing instrument, be distributed at such time and in such manner, for each taxable year, amounts of income and principal at least sufficient to avoid liability for any tax imposed by Section 4942 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section express the continuing policy of this state with respect to charitable trust interests and are enacted to assist such trusts in maintaining various tax benefits extended to them, and shall apply to all trusts described therein; provided, however, that subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to a trust in existence on July 1, 1972, to the extent that the Attorney General of this state, the trustor, or any beneficiary of such trust, on or before November 30, 1972, files with the trustee of such trust a written objection to the application to such trust of one (1) or more provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section and the trustee receiving such written objection commences an action on or before December 31, 1972, in the court having jurisdiction over such trust to reform its governing instrument or any other instrument in order to meet, or to excuse such trust from compliance with the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If a trustee receiving such written objection shall commence such an action, the one (1) or more provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section specified in such written objection shall not apply to such trust unless and until such court determines that their application to such trust is in the best interests of all parties in interest.

No trustee of a trust to which subsection (1) or (2) of this section is applicable shall be surcharged for a violation of a prohibition or requirement of said subsections unless he participated in such violation knowing that it was a violation, nor shall such a trustee be surcharged if such violation was not willful and was due to reasonable cause; provided, however, that this subsection does not exonerate a trustee from any responsibility or liability to which he is subject under any other rule of law, whether or not duplicated in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, nothing in this section shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the Attorney General with respect to any trust.

In furtherance of the continuing policy of this state to assist charitable trust interests in maintaining various tax benefits extended to them, the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be deemed to have been in force and effect on January 1, 1970; provided, however, the provisions of said subsections shall affect a trust organized before January 1, 1970, only on and after the first day of its first taxable year (for federal tax purposes) beginning on or after January 1, 1972.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 344, § 2.

386.360.
Trust instruments — How amended.

In order to assist charitable trust interests in maintaining various tax benefits extended to them, the governing instrument of a trust may be amended to permit the trust to conform to the requirements of, or to obtain benefits available under, applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code. Such amendment may be made by the trustee with the approval of the Attorney General of this state, of the trustor and, if one (1) or more beneficiaries are named in the governing instrument of such trust, of each named beneficiary. If the trustor is not then living or is not then competent to give such approval, such amendment may be made by the trustee with the approval of the Attorney General and, if one (1) or more beneficiaries are named in the governing instrument of such trust, of each named beneficiary. If one (1) or more of said required approvals is not obtained, the trustee may apply to the court having jurisdiction over such trust for approval of such amendment. Said governing instrument may also be amended in any respect and by any method set forth in such instrument or as otherwise provided by law.

Nothing in this section shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the Attorney General with respect to any trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 344, § 3.

386.365.
Distribution of assets upon dissolution — Process for selection of receiving trust — Assets available for distribution defined.

Upon termination or dissolution of any trust or other entity (other than a corporation) which is or may become an exempt organization as described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, or a charitable trust described in Section 4947(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, any assets lawfully available for distribution shall be distributed to one (1) or more qualifying organizations described in Section 501(c)(3) of said Internal Revenue Code (or described in any corresponding provision of any successor statute) which organization or organizations have a charitable purpose which, at least generally, includes a purpose similar to the terminating or dissolving organization. The organization to receive the assets of the dissolving organization hereunder shall be selected in the discretion of a majority of the managing body of the dissolving organization, and if its members cannot so agree, then the recipient organization shall be selected pursuant to a verified petition in equity filed in a court of proper jurisdiction against the terminating or dissolving organization by one (1) or more of its managing body which verified petition shall contain such statements as reasonably indicate the applicability of this section. The court upon a finding that this section is applicable shall select the qualifying organization or organizations to receive the assets to be distributed, giving preference if practicable to organizations located within the Commonwealth of Kentucky. In the event that the court shall find that this section is applicable but that there is no qualifying organization known to it which has a charitable purpose, which, at least generally, includes a purpose similar to the terminating or dissolving organization, then the court shall direct the distribution of its assets lawfully available for distribution to the Treasurer of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to be added to the general fund.

For purposes of this section “assets lawfully available for distribution” shall include the assets of a terminating or dissolving organization remaining after:

Payment, or provision for payment, of all liabilities and obligations of the organization; and

Return, transfer or conveyance of any assets held by the organization (the terms of creating instrument of which require such return, transfer or conveyance upon termination or dissolution or otherwise) in accordance with the terms of the creating instrument; and

In the event legal action is filed pursuant hereto, payment or provision for payment of all costs, including a reasonable attorney’s fee for the parties, fixed by the court.

This section shall not be construed to deprive any person of any vested property interest which he may have on June 21, 1974.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 155, § 1.

386.367.
Filing or reporting requirements — Restrictions.

Absent the showing of a compelling state interest, a state agency or state official shall not impose any filing or reporting requirements that are more burdensome than the requirements authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes on an organization that is determined to be a:

Private foundation as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code; or

Charitable trust governed by the provisions of KRS

386.350

to

386.365

.

The restrictions on filing and reporting in subsection (1) of this section do not apply in the case of the state’s direct spending programs, state grants, state contracts, or enforcement of criminal law against specific nonprofit organizations.

Nothing in this section may be construed to limit or restrict the powers, duties, remedies, or penalties available to the Attorney General, the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any private person under any other provision of statutory or common law.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 89, § 1, effective August 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(8/1/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 89, sec. 2, provides that the Act, which created this statute, may be cited as the Nonprofit Protection Act.